merged.twol
Alphabet 
	б г д й л м р с х ч ц щ ш ж з ъ ь т н э I А Б В Г Д Е И Й М Л Р С У Х Ч Ц Щ Ш Ж Ъ Ь Т Н ᵸ ᵸ:0
	а:а у:у и:и о:о е:е в:в
	а:0 у:0 и:0 о:0 е:0 в:0
	%{р%}:р %{р%}:н
	%{л%}:л %{л%}:н
	%{б%}:б %{б%}:м
	%{n.и%}:0 %{n.и%}:и
	%{v.и%}:у %{v.и%}:и %{v.и%}:0
	%{agrA%}:а %{agrA%}:0
! additional nasalization marker to insert in the verb forms, see Kibrik pp. 88-89
	%{ᵸ%}:0 %{ᵸ%}:ᵸ %{ᵸ%}:н
	%{prt%}:у %{prt%}:о %{prt%}:0
	%>
	
	%{ep.е%}:е %{ep.и%}:и %{ep.а%}:а %{ep.о%}:о %{ep.у%}:у %{ep.й%}:0 %{ep.й%}:й
;

Sets
! eps = vowels with -j epenthesis before them, see Kibrik p. 50
	eps = %{ep.е%} %{ep.и%} %{ep.а%} %{ep.о%} %{ep.у%} ;
! reps: vowels subjected to the replacement rule: see Kibrik pp. 49-50
	reps = а е и у о ;
! cons: regular consonants
	cons = ч щ ш ж з в д к р м л с з г х Ӏ б т н ;
! ncons: consonants participating in the nasalization rule, see Kibrik pp. 52-53.
	ncons = %{р%} %{л%} %{б%} ;
! mods: modifiers	
	mods = ъ Ъ Ӏ ь Ь ;
! V: regular vowels
	V = а е и у о А Е И У О %{v.и%} %{prt%} ;

Definitions

C = :cons [ :mods ]*;

Rules

"drop morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"epenthesis rule, see Kibrik p. 50"
%{ep.й%}:й <=> V _ X; where X in eps;

"replacement rule, see Kibrik pp. 49-50"
X:0 <=> _ ( ᵸ:0 ) ( %>: ) ( %{ᵸ%}: ) V; where X in reps;

"{и} persistence"
%{v.и%}:и <= V ( ᵸ:0 ) _ ;
	except
		в:0 ?* _ ; _ ( %>: ) ( %{ᵸ%}: ) ?:V;

"{и} to у after labialized"
%{v.и%}:у <=> в:0 ?* _ ; 
	except
		_ ( %>: ) ( %{ᵸ%}: ) ?:V;

"{и} to zero before other vowels"
%{v.и%}:0 <=> _ ( %{ᵸ%}: ) ?:V;
	
"labialization deletion"
в:0 <=> _ [ ? | ?^2 ] %>: %{v.и%}:?;

"ᵸ at the end"
%{ᵸ%}:ᵸ <=> .#. ?+ ᵸ:0 ?* _ .#.;

"ᵸ as n before regular consonants"
%{ᵸ%}:н <=> _ ( %>: ) [ с | ч | л ];

"nasalization deletion"
ᵸ:0 <=> _ ( %>: ) [ V | ?* ncons:* ];

"Р after nasalized vowels"
%{р%}:н <=> ᵸ:0 [ ? | ?^2 | ?^3 ] _;

"Б after nasalized vowels"
%{б%}:м <=> ᵸ:0 [ ? | ?^2 | ?^3 ] _;

"Л after nasalized vowels"
%{л%}:н <=> ᵸ:0 ?* _;

"zero in participles after а"
%{prt%}:0 <=> [ ?:о | ?:а ] ( ᵸ: ) ( %>: ) ( %{ᵸ%}: ) _;

"о in participles after е"
%{prt%}:о <=> [ е:? | ?:е ] ( ᵸ: ) ( %>: ) ( %{ᵸ%}: ) _;

"у in participles after и"
%{prt%}:у <=> [ и:? | ?:и ] ( ᵸ: ) ( %>: ) ( %{ᵸ%}: ) _; %{v.и%}:? ( %{ᵸ%}: ) _;

"ба in HPL agreement markers"
%{agrA%}:а <=> .#. ?+ _ .#.;

"special rule for i in noun markers"
%{n.и%}:0 <=> V _ ;
